Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Mississippi Gulf Region Utility Act

§ 49-17-701.
Title.

Sections 49-17-701 through 49-17-775 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-703.
Legislative findings.

In the spirit of the report of the Governor’s Commission on Recovery, Rebuilding and Renewal, the Legislature finds that there is a need for consolidation of water, wastewater and storm water services in order to reduce costs, promote resilience in the event of a disaster, improve the quality of the natural environment, and improve the planning and delivery of quality water, wastewater and storm water services within the areas of the Counties of George, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Pearl River and Stone. It is further declared that there is the need for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water services in order to ensure protection of the waters of the state and to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens of the Gulf Coast Region. The creation of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Act is determined to be necessary and essential to the accomplishment of these purposes. To facilitate the purposes of the act, the Gulf Coast Region Utility Board, the George County Utility Authority, the Hancock County Utility Authority, the Harrison County Utility Authority, the Jackson County Utility Authority, the Pearl River County Utility Authority and the Stone County Utility Authority are created herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-705.
Definitions.

Words and phrases used in this act shall have meanings as follows:

“Act” means the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Act.

“Bonds” mean interim notes having a maturity of three (3) years or less, revenue bonds and other certificates of indebtedness of the authority issued under the provisions of this act.

“County authority” means a county utility authority created in the Gulf Coast Region under this act.

“Fiscal year” means the period of time beginning on October 1 of each year and ending on September 30 of each year.

“Gulf Coast Region” means the areas encompassed by the Counties of George, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Pearl River and Stone.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city, town or village of the State of Mississippi, whether operating under general law or under special charter, lying wholly or partly within the Gulf Coast Region.

“Person” means the State of Mississippi, a county, a municipality, any public agency, or any other city, town, village or political subdivision or governmental agency, governmental instrumentality of the State of Mississippi or of the United States of America, or any private utility, individual, co-partnership, association, firm, trust, estate or any other entity whatsoever.

“Project” means the construction, development or acquisition by the county authority or county authorities of any infrastructure for water, wastewater and storm water systems or services and includes upgrading or repair of existing systems.

“Public agency” means any county, municipality, state board or commission owning or operating properties, district created pursuant to the general laws or local and private laws of the State of Mississippi, or other political subdivision of the State of Mississippi having the power to own and operate waterworks, water supply systems, sewerage systems, sewage treatment systems or other facilities or systems for the collection, transportation and treatment of water, wastewater and storm water.

“Storm water” means any flow occurring during or following any form of natural precipitation and resulting from that precipitation.

“System” or “systems” means any plants, structures, facilities and other real and personal property, used or useful in the generation, storage, transportation or supply of water, and the collection, transportation, treatment or disposal of wastewater and storm water, including, but not limited to, tanks, lakes, streams, ponds, pipes, trunk lines, mains, sewers, conduits, pipelines, pumping and ventilating stations, plants and works, connections and any other real and personal property and rights therein necessary, useful or convenient for the purposes of the utility board or authorities in connection therewith.

“Wastewater” means water being disposed of by any person and which is contaminated with waste or sewage, including industrial, municipal and any other wastewater that may cause impairment of the quality of the waters in the state.

“Water” means potable water, service water and groundwater.

“Utility board” means the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-707.
Creation of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board” to serve the citizens of the Gulf Coast Region. The utility board is created as a forum for the Gulf Coast Region to collaborate and cooperate regarding water, wastewater and storm water issues; to assist in the efficient management of water, wastewater and storm water resources; to develop recommendations pertaining to water, wastewater and storm water systems; and to provide assistance, funding and guidance to the county authorities to assist in the identification of the best means to meet all present and future water, wastewater and storm water needs in the Gulf Coast Region.

This section shall repeal July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2019, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 49-17-709.
Board of Directors of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

All powers of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Region Utility Board shall be exercised by a board of directors to be composed of the following: (i) the president of each county authority; and (ii) three (3) at-large directors, to be appointed by the Governor, who shall be residents of the Gulf Coast Region.

The initial terms of the at-large directors shall be for two (2), four (4) and six (6) years as designated by the Governor. After the expiration of the initial terms, the subsequent terms shall be for a period of six (6) years. However, there shall be no more than one (1) at-large director appointed from any one (1) county. Each president may appoint a delegate, to represent him at a meeting of the board.

At the initial meeting of the board, the board shall elect a president and a vice president. Thereafter, the board will annually, at the last meeting of the fiscal year, elect a president and a vice president who shall serve in their respective offices for the next fiscal year. The directors shall serve without a salary but are entitled to receive per diem pay as provided for in Section 25-3-69, and for actual and necessary expenses incurred while in the performance of his duties as a member of the board as provided in Section 25-3-41.

Any utility board member who does not attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the authority shall be subject to removal by a majority vote of the board and shall be replaced with an appointment from the Governor or governing body making the initial appointment.

The president shall be the chief executive officer of the utility board and the presiding officer of the board, and shall have the same right to vote as any other director. The vice president shall act in the absence or disability of the president. Each director shall be required to give bond in the sum of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), with sureties qualified to do business in this state, and the premiums on the bond shall be an expense of the utility board. Each bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi. The condition of each bond shall be that each director will faithfully perform all duties of his office and account for all monies or other assets which shall come into his custody as a director of the utility board.

A quorum for any meeting of the board of directors shall be the majority of the total membership of the board of directors. All business of the utility board shall be transacted by vote of the board of directors.

The utility board shall conduct regular meetings as set forth in its bylaws. The utility board shall establish rules and regulations regarding its meetings and may amend such bylaws, rules and regulations as may be necessary to conduct the business of the board.

This section shall repeal July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 368, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2019, ch. 401, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 49-17-711.
Employees; budget [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The utility board may hire an executive director and secretary-treasurer having the duties as determined by the utility board. The executive director must have a college degree. If hired, the executive director and secretary-treasurer each shall be required to give bond in a sum not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), conditioned on the executive director and secretary-treasurer faithfully performing all duties of his office and account for all monies and other assets which come into his custody as executive director or secretary-treasurer of the utility board.

The utility board shall prepare a budget consistent with its bylaws estimating its expenses and revenue needs for each forthcoming fiscal year at least ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of each fiscal year. The utility board shall submit its budget to each county authority prior to final approval by the utility board.

Any funds, gifts or grants allocated for the administrative costs related to the restoration or construction of water, wastewater and storm water services and projects in the Gulf Coast Region under this act shall, to the extent allowable, be paid into the Public Trust Tidelands Fund for the repayment of any tideland funds expended for the operational costs of the utility board.

The utility board shall have the authority to receive and spend funds from any source.

This section shall repeal July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 494, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 446, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 368, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2019, ch. 401 § 3,.

§ 49-17-713.
Duties and responsibilities of the utility board [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The utility board shall have the right and powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this act, including, but not limited to:

Make recommendations to the county authorities pertaining to water, wastewater and storm water issues in the Gulf Coast Region;

Make recommendations necessary to achieve compatibility and uniformity of systems and technology related to water, wastewater and storm water in the Gulf Coast Region;

Help resolve cross-jurisdictional and multicounty disputes pertaining to water, wastewater and storm water issues between county authorities when requested by the county authorities;

Recommend short-term and long-term priorities for water, wastewater and storm water related projects;

Recommend emergency preparedness procedures in the Gulf Coast Region related to water, wastewater and storm water;

Recommend training standards related to operations of water, wastewater and storm water systems;

Sue and be sued in its own name and to enjoy all the protections, immunities and benefits provided by the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, as it may be amended from time to time;

Adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Maintain office space at such place or places within the boundaries of the board as it may determine;

Own or lease real or personal property;

Invest money of the utility board, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds subject to any agreements with bond holders on such terms and in such manner as the utility board deems proper;

Apply for, accept and utilize grants, gifts and other funds from any source for any purpose necessary in support of the purpose of this act and to coordinate the distribution of funds to the county authorities;

Employ and terminate staff, including, but not limited to, attorneys, engineers and consultants as may be necessary;

Enter into contracts for all operation and maintenance needs of the utility board;

Enter into contracts to conduct studies of regional issues regarding water, wastewater and storm water services and to provide assistance, funds and guidance in the construction, operation and maintenance of regional water, wastewater and storm water services;

Enter into contracts with any person or any public agency in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this act upon such consideration as the board of directors and such person may agree. Any such contract may extend over any period of time, including a term which extends beyond the term of the then majority of the existing board members, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary; may be upon such terms and for such consideration, nominal or otherwise, as the parties thereto shall agree; and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated. Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms. The utility board may also assume or continue any contractual or other business relationships entered into by the members of the utility board, including the rights to receive and acquire property transferred under option to purchase agreements;

Contract with the authorities under any terms mutually agreed by the parties to carry out any powers, duties or responsibilities granted by this act or any other laws to the authorities;

Acquire insurance for the utility board’s systems, facilities, buildings, treatment plants and all property, real or personal, to insure against all risks as any insurance may, from time to time, be available;

Make, enforce, amend and repeal rules and regulations for the management of the utility board’s business and affairs;

Enter onto public or private lands, waters or premises for the purposes of making surveys, borings or soundings, or conducting tests, examinations or inspections for the purposes of the utility board, subject to responsibility for any damage done to property entered;

Apply, contract for, accept, receive and administer gifts, grants, appropriations and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon any terms and conditions as the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality shall impose;

Create, maintain and regulate reservoirs and promulgate and enforce rules and regulations for the creation and maintenance of reservoirs; and

Make other recommendations to carry out the purposes of this act.

This section shall repeal July 1, 2023.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 7; Laws, 2009, ch. 494, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 446, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 368, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2019, ch. 401, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 49-17-715.
Creation of the George County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “George County Utility Authority,” unless the George County Board of Supervisors dissolves the authority by January 1, 2007, as provided in subsection (2). The authority will be composed of the geographic area of George County as defined in Section 19-1-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water systems in order to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens residing within the boundaries of George County. The George County Utility Authority shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions, and the George County Utility Authority shall be empowered in accordance with the provisions of this act to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

[Repealed]

If the county authority is dissolved, the board of supervisors may reestablish the county authority by a resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes stating the necessity for the county authority. The board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State, the Public Service Commission and the utility board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-717.
Board of Directors for George County Utility Authority.

If the authority is created, all powers of the George County Utility Authority shall be exercised by a board of directors comprised of five (5) directors appointed as follows: Within thirty (30) days of creation of the authority, the Board of Supervisors of George County shall appoint three (3) residents from the county, and the Board of Aldermen of the City of Lucedale shall appoint two (2) residents from the city. The directors shall serve at the will and pleasure of the governing body making the appointments. Any vacancy arising by expiration of a director’s term, or a vacancy created by the removal of a director for any other reason, shall be filled by appointment made by the party originally responsible for the appointment of the director vacating his or her appointment.

All business of the George County Utility Authority shall be transacted as provided in Section 49-17-741, except that all actions affecting rates, bonds or capital improvements must be by unanimous vote of all members of the board.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-719.
Creation of the Pearl River County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Pearl River County Utility Authority.” The authority is composed of the geographic area of Pearl River County as defined in Section 19-1-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water systems in order to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens residing within the boundaries of Pearl River County. The Pearl River County Utility Authority shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions, and the Pearl River County Utility Authority shall be empowered in accordance with the provisions of this act to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-721.
Board of Directors for Pearl River County Utility Authority.

All powers of the Pearl River County Utility Authority shall be exercised by a board of directors comprised of seven (7) directors appointed as follows: Within thirty (30) days of April 18, 2006, the Board of Supervisors of Pearl River County shall appoint four (4) residents from the county, and the Board of Aldermen of the City of Picayune shall appoint two (2) residents from the city, and the Board of Aldermen of the City of Poplarville shall appoint one (1) resident from the city. The directors shall serve at the will and pleasure of the governing body making the appointments.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-723.
Creation of the Stone County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Stone County Utility Authority.” The authority is composed of the geographic area of Stone County as defined in Section 19-1-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water systems in order to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens residing within the boundaries of Stone County. The Stone County Utility Authority shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions, and the Stone County Utility Authority shall be empowered in accordance with the provisions of this act to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-725.
Board of Directors for Stone County Utility Authority.

All powers of the Stone County Utility Authority shall be exercised by a board of directors comprised of five (5) directors appointed as follows: Within thirty (30) days of passage of this act, the Board of Supervisors of Stone County shall appoint three (3) residents from the county, and the Board of Aldermen of the City of Wiggins shall appoint two (2) residents from the city. The directors shall serve at the will and pleasure of the governing body making the appointments.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-727.
Creation of the Harrison County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Harrison County Utility Authority.” The authority is composed of the geographic area of Harrison County as defined in Section 19-1-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater, storm water and solid waste systems in order to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater, storm water and solid waste services to citizens residing within the boundaries of Harrison County.

Within thirty (30) days of April 18, 2006, the Harrison County Utility Authority and the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District shall consolidate into a single agency, to be known as the Harrison County Utility Authority, which shall be a continuance of the corporate existence of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District. Such consolidation shall be effective by the concurrent resolution of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District and the Harrison County Utility Authority and the filing of a copy of such concurrent resolution with the Secretary of State, certified by the Secretary of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District and the Harrison County Utility Authority.

Upon consolidation, the following shall apply:

All property, rights and powers of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District are hereby vested in and shall be exercised by the Harrison County Utility Authority, subject, however to all pledges, covenants, agreements and trusts made or created by the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District;

All debts, liabilities, obligations, agreements, contracts and covenants of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District are hereby imposed upon the Harrison County Utility Authority. Any property of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District in which a mortgage or security interest has been granted to any bondholders or other creditors of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District shall continue to be subject to the mortgage or security interest until the mortgage or security interest is defeased or terminated in accordance with its terms. All bondholders and other creditors of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District and persons having claims against or contracts with the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District of any kind or character may enforce those debts, claims and contracts against the Harrison County Utility Authority in the same manner as they might have against the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District, and the rights and remedies of those bondholders, creditors, and persons having claims or contracts shall not be limited or restricted in any manner by this act;

All regulations of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District shall continue to be in effect as the regulations of the Harrison County Utility Authority until amended, supplemented or rescinded by the authority in accordance with law; and

All employees of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District shall become employees of the Harrison County Utility Authority. Nothing in this act shall affect the civil service status, if any, of those employees or their rights, privileges, obligations or status with respect to any pension or retirement system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-729.
Board of Directors for Harrison County Utility Authority.

All powers of the Harrison County Utility Authority shall be exercised by a consolidated board consisting of the Board of Directors of the Harrison County Wastewater and Solid Waste Management District and the additional director provided under this section for a total of seven (7) directors. Upon consolidation, the Board of Supervisors of Harrison County shall appoint one (1) additional director who shall be a resident of the unincorporated area from the county. The director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board of supervisors. The consolidated board shall consist of the mayor of each city participating in the authority and the directors appointed by the board of supervisors. Each director may appoint a delegate to represent him at a meeting of the board.

All business of the Harrison County Utility Authority shall be transacted as provided in Section 49-17-741, except that all actions affecting rates, bonds or capital improvements must be by unanimous vote of all members of the board.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public, including the power and right to regulate and control solid waste within its jurisdictional boundaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-731.
Creation of the Jackson County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Jackson County Utility Authority.” The authority is composed of the geographic area of Jackson County as defined in Section 19-1-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water and wastewater systems in order to ensure the delivery of water and wastewater services to citizens residing within the boundaries of Jackson County.

Within thirty (30) days of April 18, 2006, the Jackson County Utility Authority and the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority shall consolidate into a single agency, to be known as the Jackson County Utility Authority, which shall be a continuance of the corporate existence of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority. Such consolidation shall be effective by the concurrent resolution of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority and the Jackson County Utility Authority and the filing of a copy of such concurrent resolution with the Secretary of State, certified by the Secretary of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority and the Jackson County Utility Authority.

Upon consolidation the following shall apply:

All property, rights and powers of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority are hereby vested in and shall be exercised by the Jackson County Utility Authority, subject, however to all pledges, covenants, agreements and trusts made or created by the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority;

All debts, liabilities, obligations, agreements, contracts and covenants of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority are hereby imposed upon the Jackson County Utility Authority. Any property of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority in which a mortgage or security interest has been granted to any bondholders or other creditors of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority shall continue to be subject to the mortgage or security interest until the mortgage or security interest is defeased or terminated in accordance with its terms. All bondholders and other creditors of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority and persons having claims against or contracts with the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority of any kind or character may enforce those debts, claims and contracts against the Jackson County Utility Authority in the same manner as they might have against the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority, and the rights and remedies of those bondholders, creditors, and persons having claims or contracts shall not be limited or restricted in any manner by this act;

All regulations of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority shall continue to be in effect as the regulations of the Jackson County Utility Authority until amended, supplemented or rescinded by the Jackson County Utility Authority in accordance with law; and

All employees of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority shall become employees of the Jackson County Utility Authority. Nothing in this act shall affect the civil service status, if any, of those employees or their rights, privileges, obligations or status with respect to any pension or retirement system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-733.
Board of Directors for Jackson County Utility Authority.

Upon creation of the Jackson County Utility Authority, all powers of the Jackson County Utility Authority shall be exercised by the board of directors of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority.

Upon consolidation of the Jackson County Utility Authority and the Mississippi Gulf Coast Wastewater Authority, the county authority shall be governed by a board consisting of seven (7) directors.

The members of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority shall serve as Directors of the Jackson County Utility Authority until the expiration of their existing terms.Upon expiration of a member’s term, the governing body making the appointment shall appoint a person residing within the corporate boundaries of the governing body to serve as a director.

The City of Gautier shall appoint one (1) director who resides within the City of Gautier for an initial term of three (3) years.

The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County shall appoint two (2) additional directors for an initial term of two (2) and four (4) years, respectively, who reside within the unincorporated area of Jackson County.

After expiration of the initial terms, all appointed directors shall serve a term of six (6) years.

No director shall hold an elected public office.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-735.
Creation of the Hancock County Utility Authority.

There is hereby created and established a public body corporate and politic constituting a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi to be known as the “Hancock County Utility Authority.” The authority is composed of the geographic area of Hancock County as defined in Section 19-1-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation and coordination of water, wastewater and storm water systems in order to ensure the delivery of water, wastewater and storm water services to citizens residing within the boundaries of Hancock County.

Within thirty (30) days of April 18, 2006, the Hancock County Utility Authority and the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District shall consolidate into a single agency, to be known as the Hancock County Utility Authority, which shall be a continuance of the corporate existence of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District. Such consolidation shall be effective by the concurrent resolution of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District and the Hancock County Utility Authority and the filing of a copy of such concurrent resolution with the Secretary of State, certified by the Secretary of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District and the Hancock County Utility Authority.

Upon consolidation, the following shall apply:

All property, rights and powers of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District are hereby vested in and shall be exercised by the Hancock County Utility Authority, subject, however to all pledges, covenants, agreements and trusts made or created by the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District;

All debts, liabilities, obligations, agreements, contracts and covenants of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District are hereby imposed upon the Hancock County Utility Authority. Any property of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District in which a mortgage or security interest has been granted to any bondholders or other creditors of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District shall continue to be subject to the mortgage or security interest until the mortgage or security interest is defeased or terminated in accordance with its terms. All bondholders and other creditors of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District and persons having claims against or contracts with the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District of any kind or character may enforce those debts, claims and contracts against the authority in the same manner as they might have against the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District, and the rights and remedies of those bondholders, creditors, and persons having claims or contracts shall not be limited or restricted in any manner by this act;

All regulations of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District shall continue to be in effect as the regulations of the Hancock County Utility Authority until amended, supplemented or rescinded by the Hancock County Utility Authority in accordance with law; and

All employees of the Southern Regional Wastewater Management District shall become employees of the authority. Nothing in this act shall affect the civil service status, if any, of those employees or their rights, privileges, obligations or status with respect to any pension or retirement system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-737.
Board of Directors for Hancock County Utility Authority.

After consolidation, all powers of the Hancock County Utility Authority shall be exercised by a board consisting of the following:

One (1) director who is the Mayor of Bay St. Louis, or his or her designee, for an initial term of two (2) years;

One (1) director who is the Mayor of Waveland, or his or her designee, for an initial term of three (3) years;

One (1) director who is the President of the Board of Supervisors of Hancock County, or his or her designee, for an initial term of four (4) years;

One (1) director who is the Chairman of the Kiln Utility and Fire District;

One (1) director who is the Chairman of the Hancock County Water and Sewer District; and

One (1) director who is the Chairman of the Pearlington Water and Sewer District.

After expiration of the initial terms, the directors in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) shall serve a term of four (4) years.

In addition to any other powers and rights conferred upon such board of directors, the board is granted and may exercise all powers and rights granted pursuant to Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 to promote the health, welfare and prosperity of the general public.

Any designee serving as a director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the governing authority that designated the director.

Any person who is designated by a mayor to be a director on the board of the Hancock County Utility Authority shall have the same voting powers on the board as the mayor who designated such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 19; Laws, 2010, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 902, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 303, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 49-17-739.
Provisions common to the county authorities.

The purpose of Sections 49-17-739 through 49-17-773 is to confer certain powers on the county authorities for the purpose of cooperating with federal, state and local public agencies for the further development of local and regional water, wastewater and storm water services within the Gulf Coast Region. In addition to the powers over water, wastewater and storm water, the Harrison County Utility Authority is granted power over solid waste within its jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).